Hawaii statutes.
[§342J-10.6] Guarantors. (a) In
a case where the owner or operator is in bankruptcy, reorganization, or
arrangement pursuant to the Federal Bankruptcy Code or where (with reasonable
diligence) jurisdiction in any [environmental court] cannot be obtained over an
owner or operator likely to be solvent at the time of judgment, any claim
arising from conduct for which evidence of financial responsibility must be
provided under this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter may be
asserted directly against the guarantor providing evidence of financial
responsibility. In the case of any action pursuant to this section, the
guarantor shall be entitled to invoke all rights and defenses which would have
been available to the owner or operator by the claimant and which would have
been available to the guarantor if an action had been brought against the
guarantor by the owner or operator.

(b) The total liability of any guarantor shall
be limited to the aggregate amount which the guarantor has provided as evidence
of financial responsibility to the owner or operator under this chapter or
rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to limit any other statutory, contractual or common law liability of
a guarantor to its owner or operator including, but not limited to, the
liability of the guarantor for bad faith either in negotiations or in failing
to negotiate the settlement of any claim. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to diminish the liability of any person under chapter 128D or other
applicable law.

(c) For the purpose of this section, the term "guarantor"
means any person, other than the owner or operator, who provides evidence of
financial responsibility for an owner or operator under this chapter or rules
adopted pursuant to this chapter. [L 1991, c 259, pt of §1; am L 2014, c
218, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next